parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/PORTUGUESE/FST2/src/lex-demonyms.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# CONTENT:     demonyms 
!# 		= adjectives/nouns for habitants of countries, cities, etc.
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:    PORTUGUESE
!#
!# CREATED:	19-Aug-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!# ============================================================================
Multichar_Symbols
! main categories
+Adj
+Noun

! sub types
+Demonym

! other features

+Masc +Fem +MF
+Sg +Pl +SP

+Abbr +Acron


! special markers

+NAdj	! not a final category, it will be converted into [+Adj|+Noun] !!

(.)     ! optional dot
(-)     ! optional hyphen
[-]     ! hyphen or space

^]	! inflection marker

!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# Continuation classes

LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;

LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

!# plural = singular
LEXICON MSP	+Masc+SP	#;
LEXICON FSP	+Fem+SP		#;
LEXICON MFSP	MSP; FSP;

!# masc = fem
LEXICON XSG	+MF+Sg		#;
LEXICON XPL	+MF+Pl		#;
LEXICON XSGPL	XSG; XPL;

!# masc = fem; plural = singular
LEXICON XSP	+MF+SP		#;

LEXICON ROOT
abadinense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
abevillense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
ablitense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
acarnaniano^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
açoriano^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
adelaidense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
adulita^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;		!??
afroamericano^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
água-pedrense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
alagoano^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
alasquiano^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
albergariense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
albufeirense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
alcobacence^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
aldegalense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
alentejano^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
aletrino^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
algarviense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
alijoense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
almadense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
almodovarense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
altairano^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
alvaiazerense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
alvitense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
amarantino^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
amazonense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
amerino^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
anadiense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
anastaciano^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
andamanês^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
andorriano^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
angrense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
antilhano^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
antofagastense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
árabe-saudita^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;		!??
arcuense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
arménio^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
arubano^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
ateniense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
austro-húngaro^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
azeitonense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
badio^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
bajeense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
baramês^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
barquense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
basco^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
beirão+NAdj+Demonym:beiroa^]		FSGPL;
belemita^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;		!??
belo-valense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
beninês^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
bernense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
birmã^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;		!MF??
bissanense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
bogotano^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
borbense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
bosnense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
botsuanense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
bragancês^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
brasiliense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
bucarestense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
burquinabê^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;		!??
butanês^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
cachoeirense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
calabrês^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
calpense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
campaniano^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
canarino^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
cantuariense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
carandaiense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
carrarense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
casablanquense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
castelhano^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
catarinense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
cazaquistanês^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
ceutense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
checo^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
cinfanense^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
cisdanubiano^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
cochinchino^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
coloniano^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
conguês^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
cordovês^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
corvense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
courense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
croata^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;		!??
curvelano^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
damasceno^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
dominicano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
egipcíaco^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
engadino^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
escalabitano^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
espanhol^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
estanciense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
etíope^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
fário^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
fenício^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
filadelfiano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
finlandês^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
florense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
fortalezense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
frísio^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
gaiense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
gandrense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
gediniano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
geresano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
givetiano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
goleganense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
grandolense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
guairense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
guineano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
havaiano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
heleno^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
hispaniense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
ianque^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
igeditano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
indostano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
iraniano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
israeliano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
itambeense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
jau^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;		!??
joinvilense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
jutlandês^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
lagoa-santense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
lanhosense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
leixonense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
libanês^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
limarense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
lipsiense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
lituano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
lourenço-marquino^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
lunda^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;		!??
macaísta^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;		!??
machadense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
madrilês^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
malabarense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
malawiano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
maltense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
manchesteriano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
maputense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
marinhense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
mato-grossense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
mealhadense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
meritiense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
miguelense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
mirassolense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
moimentense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
mondinense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
monte-sionense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
mossoroense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
murtosense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
navarrês^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
neozelandês^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
nigerino^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
norfolquino^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
norueguês^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
ocidental^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;
olindense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
omaniano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
ourenense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
ovetense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
palatino^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
pampilhosense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
paraguaiano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
parmense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
paulense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
penafidelense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
penichense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
pessoense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
piraporense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
polonês^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
ponte-sorense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
porto-mosense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
portugalense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
praiense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
quirguistanês^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
regiense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
ribacudense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
riodonorês^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
riquenho^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
ruandense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
sabugalense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
salaciano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
salomônico^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
samaritano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
santa-catarinense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
santanense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
são-joanino^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
são-vicentino^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
sarense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
sebastianense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
senense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
serrenho^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
severense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
siluriano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
siquimense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
socotorino^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
sourense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
sul-africano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
sul-vietnamita^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;		!??
tajique^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
tártaro^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
tebano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
tessalonicense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
tirsense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
tonganês^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
trancosano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
tridentina^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;		!??
tuaregue^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
turdetano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
ubatubense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
uraliano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
vaguense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
vanuatuense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
vasconcelense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
venusino^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
vianês^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
vietnamita^]+NAdj+Demonym		MFSGPL;		!??
vila-novense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
vinhaense^]+NAdj+Demonym			MFSGPL;
windsoriano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
yorkshiriano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
zimbabueano^]+NAdj+Demonym				MFSGPL;
